District of Columbia statutes.
10-1141.03a

Waiver or reduction of permit fees for the occupation of public space, public rights of way, and public structures.

The Mayor may waive or reduce any permit fee, except for the application fee, to occupy or otherwise use public space, public rights of way, or public structures for a project that:

(1)

Is conducted by a Business Improvement District or Community Improvement District established pursuant to subchapter VIII of Chapter 12 of Title 2 [§ 2-1215.01 et seq.];

(2)

In the Mayor’s determination, serves a public benefit;

(3)

Does not impose costs on the District government; and

(4)

Does not involve commercial sponsorship.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 603a
as added Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-48, § 2, 58 DCR 8943
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Public Space Permit Fee Waiver Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-163, October 11, 2011, 58 DCR 8892).